Nebraska, session 109, LB433.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB433 LB433
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-1316, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1316 (1) All agencies and personnel of state government shall be
covered by sections 81-1301 to 81-1319 and shall be considered subject to
the State Personnel System, except the following:
(a) All personnel of the office of the Governor;
(b) All personnel of the office of the Lieutenant Governor;
(c) All personnel of the office of the Secretary of State;
(d) All personnel of the office of the State Treasurer;
(e) All personnel of the office of the Attorney General;
(f) All personnel of the office of the Auditor of Public Accounts;
(g) All personnel of the Legislature;
(h) All personnel of the court systems;
(i) All personnel of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds;
(j) All personnel of the Public Service Commission;
(k) All personnel of the Nebraska Brand Committee;
(l) All personnel of the Commission of Industrial Relations;
(m) All personnel of the State Department of Education;
(n) All personnel of the Nebraska state colleges and the Board of
Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges;
(o) All personnel of the University of Nebraska;
(p) All personnel of the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education;
(q) All personnel of the Governor's Policy Research Office;
(r) All personnel of the Commission on Public Advocacy;
(s) All agency heads;
(t)(i) The Director of Behavioral Health of the Division of
Behavioral Health; (ii) the Director of Children and Family Services of
the Division of Children and Family Services; (iii) the Director of
Developmental Disabilities of the Division of Developmental Disabilities;
(iv) the Director of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Division of
-2-

LB433 LB433
2025 2025
Medicaid and Long-Term Care; and (v) the Director of Public Health of the
Division of Public Health;
(u) The chief medical officer established under section 81-3115, the
Administrator of the Office of Juvenile Services, and the chief executive
officers of the Beatrice State Developmental Center, Lincoln Regional
Center, Norfolk Regional Center, Hastings Regional Center, Central
Nebraska Veterans' Home, Norfolk Veterans' Home, Eastern Nebraska
Veterans' Home, Western Nebraska Veterans' Home, and each youth
rehabilitation and treatment center;
(v) The chief executive officers of all facilities operated by the
Department of Correctional Services and the medical director for the
department appointed pursuant to section 83-4,156;
(w) All personnel employed as pharmacists, physicians,
psychiatrists, or psychologists by the Department of Correctional
Services;
(x) All personnel employed as pharmacists, physicians,
psychiatrists, psychologists, service area administrators, or facility
operating officers of the Department of Health and Human Services or the
Department of Veterans' Affairs;
(y) Deputies and examiners of the Department of Banking and Finance
and the Department of Insurance as set forth in sections 8-105 and
44-119, except for those deputies and examiners who remain in the State
Personnel System;
(z) All personnel of the Tax Equalization and Review Commission;
(aa) The associate director of the Conservation Division of the
Nebraska State Historical Society and all personnel employed as a
Conservator I or Conservator II of the Conservation Division of the
Nebraska State Historical Society; and
(bb) Assistant directors and deputies of the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems; .
(cc) All personnel employed as deputy directors of all agencies. For
-3-

LB433 LB433
2025 2025
purposes of this subdivision, deputy director includes, but is not
limited to, any position titled deputy director and any person in the
position to fill in and have the authority to act in the absence of the
director of an agency on other than an interim basis. Each deputy
director hired by a state agency after the effective date of this act
shall hold office at the will of the director of the agency and shall
receive such salary as fixed by such director and approved by the
Governor based upon the level of credentials for the position. Each
employee who is employed on the effective date of this act as a deputy
director may elect to become employed at will. The election to become
employed at will may be made at any time upon notification to the
director of the agency in writing, but once made, such election shall be
final. Until the election to be employed at will is made, the employee
shall be treated as continuing to participate in the State Personnel
System; and
(dd) All personnel employed as attorneys of all agencies. For
purposes of this subdivision, attorney includes, but is not limited to,
any position titled attorney and any position that requires the employee
to have a juris doctorate degree and be licensed to practice law in the
State of Nebraska. Each attorney hired by a state agency after the
effective date of this act shall hold office at the will of the director
of the agency and shall receive such salary as fixed by such director and
approved by the Governor based upon the level of credentials for the
position. Each employee who is employed on the effective date of this act
as an attorney by a state agency may elect to become employed at will.
The election to become employed at will may be made at any time upon
notification to the director of the agency in writing, but once made,
such election shall be final. Until the election to be employed at will
is made, the employee shall be treated as continuing to participate in
the State Personnel System.
(2) At each agency head's discretion, up to the following number of
-4-

LB433 LB433
2025 2025
additional positions may be exempted from the State Personnel System,
based on the following agency size categories:
Number of Agency Number of Noncovered
Employees Positions
less than 25 0
25 to 100 1
101 to 250 2
251 to 500 3
501 to 1000 4
1001 to 2000 5
2001 to 3000 8
3001 to 4000 11
4001 to 5000 40
over 5000 50
The purpose of having such noncovered positions shall be to allow
agency heads the opportunity to recruit, hire, and supervise critical,
confidential, or policymaking personnel without restrictions from
selection procedures, compensation rules, career protections, and
grievance privileges. Persons holding the noncovered positions shall
serve at the pleasure of the agency head and shall be paid salaries set
by the agency head. An agency with over five thousand employees shall
provide notice in writing to the Health and Human Services Committee of
the Legislature when forty noncovered positions have been filled by the
agency head pursuant to this subsection.
(3) No changes to this section or to the number of noncovered
positions within an agency shall affect the status of personnel employed
on the date the changes become operative without their prior written
agreement. A state employee's career protections or coverage by personnel
rules and regulations shall not be revoked by redesignation of the
employee's position as a noncovered position without the prior written
agreement of such employee.
-5-

LB433 LB433
2025 2025
Sec. 2. Section 84-1307, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1307 (1) The membership of the retirement system shall be
composed of all persons who are or were employed by the State of Nebraska
and who maintain an account balance with the retirement system.
(2) The following employees of the State of Nebraska are authorized
to participate in the retirement system: (a) All permanent full-time
employees who have attained the age of eighteen years shall begin
participation in the retirement system upon employment; and (b) all
permanent part-time employees who have attained the age of eighteen years
may exercise the option to begin participation in the retirement system
within the first thirty days of employment except as provided in section
84-1322; and (c) all temporary employees who were prior contributing
members of the retirement system and who are returning to service with
the state prior to having a one-hundred-twenty-day break in service
pursuant to subsection (5) of section 84-1322 shall begin participation
in the retirement system within the first thirty days of employment as a
temporary employee. An employee who exercises the option to begin
participation in the retirement system pursuant to this section shall
remain in the retirement system until his or her termination of
employment or retirement, regardless of any change of status as a
permanent or temporary employee.
(3) No employee shall be authorized to participate in the retirement
system provided for in the State Employees Retirement Act unless the
employee is a United States citizen or is lawfully present in the United
States. The employing state agency and the employee shall maintain at
least one of the following documents which shall be unexpired, if
applicable to the particular document, to demonstrate United States
citizenship or lawful presence in the United States as of the employee's
date of hire and produce any such document so maintained upon request of
the retirement board or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems:
-6-

LB433 LB433
2025 2025
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(e) A United States passport;
(f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services granting employment authorization in the United States and
approved by the retirement board.
(4) For purposes of this section, (a) permanent full-time employees
includes employees of the Legislature or Legislative Council who work
one-half or more of the regularly scheduled hours during each pay period
of the legislative session, and (b) permanent part-time employees
includes employees of the Legislature or Legislative Council who work
less than one-half of the regularly scheduled hours during each pay
period of the legislative session, and (c) temporary employees includes
employees of the Legislature or Legislative Council who are hired for (i)
a limited period of time of less than six months or six months or more
and less than or equal to twelve months or two thousand eighty hours or
-7-

LB433 LB433
2025 2025
(ii) a grant-funded position or a special project.
(5)(a) Within the first one hundred eighty days of employment, a
full-time employee may apply to the board for vesting credit for years of
participation in another Nebraska governmental plan, as defined by
section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. During the years of
participation in the other Nebraska governmental plan, the employee must
have been a full-time employee, as defined in the Nebraska governmental
plan in which the credit was earned. The board may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations governing the assessment and granting of vesting
credit.
(b) If the contributory retirement plan or contract let pursuant to
section 48-609, as such section existed prior to January 1, 2018, is
terminated, employees of the Department of Labor who are active
participants in such contributory retirement plan or contract on the date
of termination of such plan or contract shall be granted vesting credit
for their years of participation in such plan or contract.
(6) Any employee who qualifies for membership in the retirement
system pursuant to this section may not be disqualified for membership in
the retirement system solely because such employee also maintains
separate employment which qualifies the employee for membership in
another public retirement system, nor may membership in this retirement
system disqualify such an employee from membership in another public
retirement system solely by reason of separate employment which qualifies
such employee for membership in this retirement system.
(7) State agencies shall ensure that employees authorized to
participate in the retirement system pursuant to this section shall
enroll and make required contributions to the retirement system
immediately upon becoming an employee. Information necessary to determine
membership in the retirement system shall be provided by the employer.
Sec. 3. Original sections 81-1316 and 84-1307, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-8-